Maryland, session 2025, SB0922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
SUBTITLE 22. TRAVEL SERVICES.
17–2201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DIVISION” MEANS THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0922*

SENATE BILL 922
(C) “INDEPENDENT AGENT” MEANS A PERSON THAT OFFERS OR
UNDERTAKES TO ARRANGE FOR OR PROVIDE THE TRAVEL SERVICES SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (D)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION BUT DOES NOT:
(1) RECEIVE MONEY OR OTHER VALUABLE CONSIDERATION
DIRECTLY FROM THE PURCHASER FOR THE SALE OF TRAVEL SERVICES OR FROM
THE ULTIMATE TRAVEL SUPPLIER;
(2) POSSESS AT ANY TIME ANY UNISSUED TICKET STOCK OR TRAVEL
DOCUMENT; OR
(3) HAVE THE ABILITY TO ISSUE TICKETS, VACATION CERTIFICATES,
OR ANY OTHER TRAVEL DOCUMENTS.
(D) (1) “SELLER OF TRAVEL” MEANS A PERSON THAT:
(I) IS LOCATED IN THE STATE OR OFFERS TO SELL TRAVEL
SERVICES TO A PERSON LOCATED IN THE STATE;
(II) OFFERS OR UNDERTAKES TO ARRANGE OR PROVIDE FOR:
1. TRAVEL RESERVATIONS OR ACCOMMODATIONS;
2. TICKETS FOR TRAVEL BY ANY MODE OF
TRANSPORTATION;
3. HOTEL OR MOTEL ACCOMMODATIONS;
4. CAR RENTALS; OR
5. SIGHTSEEING TOURS; AND
(III) RECEIVES VALUABLE CONSIDERATION DIRECTLY FROM
THE PURCHASER FOR THE SALE OF TRAVEL SERVICES OR FROM THE ULTIMATE
TRAVEL SUPPLIER.
(2) “SELLER OF TRAVEL” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) AN AIR CARRIER;
(II) AN OCEAN CARRIER; OR

SENATE BILL 922 3
(III) A HOTEL, MOTEL, OR SIMILAR LODGING ESTABLISHMENT
THAT, IN THE COURSE OF SELLING, PROVIDING, OR ARRANGING TRANSIENT
LODGING ACCOMMODATIONS AND RELATED SERVICES FOR ITS REGISTERED
GUESTS:
1. ARRANGES OR PROVIDES FOR TRANSPORTATION; AND
2. DOES NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY RECEIVE MONEY
OR OTHER VALUABLE CONSIDERATION FOR ARRANGING OR PROVIDING THAT
TRANSPORTATION.
17–2202.
(A) (1) EACH SELLER OF TRAVEL OR INDEPENDENT AGENT SHALL FILE
ANNUALLY WITH THE DEPARTMENT EVIDENCE OF FINANCIAL SECURITY AS
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) EACH SELLER OF TRAVEL SHALL FILE ANNUALLY WITH THE
DEPARTMENT A LIST OF INDEPENDENT AGENTS AFFILIATED WITH THE SELLER OF
TRAVEL.
(3) THE ANNUAL FILING FEE IS $300.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT RECEIVE VALUABLE CONSIDERATION IN PAYMENT
FOR SERVICES OFFERED FOR SALE BY A SELLER OF TRAVEL OR AN INDEPENDENT
AGENT UNLESS, AT THE TIME OF RECEIVING THE PAYMENT, THE SELLER OF TRAVEL
OR INDEPENDENT AGENT HAS MET THE ANNUAL FILING REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) IF THERE IS A MATERIAL CHANGE IN THE FINANCIAL SECURITY OF A
SELLER OF TRAVEL OR AN INDEPENDENT AGENT DURING THE PERIOD BETWEEN
THE ANNUAL FILINGS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE
SELLER OF TRAVEL OR AN INDEPENDENT AGENT SHALL FILE AN ADDENDUM WITH
THE DEPARTMENT.
17–2203.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, EVIDENCE OF THE
FINANCIAL SECURITY REQUIRED UNDER § 17–2202 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE A
SURETY OR CASH PERFORMANCE BOND RELATIVE TO THE ANNUAL GROSS INCOME
OF THE SELLER OF TRAVEL OR INDEPENDENT AGENT IN THE STATE AS FOLLOWS:

SENATE BILL 922
(I) IF THE ANNUAL GROSS INCOME OF BUSINESS CONDUCTED
IN THE STATE IS LESS THAN $200,000, THE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT OF THE SURETY
BOND SHALL BE $10,000;
(II) IF THE ANNUAL GROSS INCOME OF BUSINESS CONDUCTED
IN THE STATE IS $200,000 OR MORE BUT LESS THAN $500,000, THE PRINCIPAL
AMOUNT OF THE SURETY BOND SHALL BE $20,000;
(III) IF THE ANNUAL GROSS INCOME OF BUSINESS CONDUCTED
IN THE STATE IS $500,000 OR MORE BUT LESS THAN $750,000, THE PRINCIPAL
AMOUNT OF THE SURETY BOND SHALL BE $30,000;
(IV) IF THE ANNUAL GROSS INCOME OF BUSINESS CONDUCTED
IN THE STATE IS $750,000 OR MORE BUT LESS THAN $1,000,000, THE PRINCIPAL
AMOUNT OF THE SURETY BOND SHALL BE $40,000; AND
(V) IF THE ANNUAL GROSS INCOME OF BUSINESS CONDUCTED
IN THE STATE IS $1,000,000 OR MORE, THE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT OF THE SURETY
BOND SHALL BE $50,000.
(2) ANY SURETY BOND UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL CONFORM
WITH THE INSURANCE ARTICLE AND BE EXECUTED BY A SURETY COMPANY
AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN THE STATE.
(B) IN LIEU OF THE BOND REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A SELLER OF TRAVEL OR AN INDEPENDENT AGENT MAY:
(1) OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF DEPOSIT OR AN IRREVOCABLE LETTER
OF CREDIT FROM A STATE BANKING INSTITUTION IN THE AMOUNT OF THE
PERFORMANCE BOND;
(2) FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT PROOF OF PROFESSIONAL
LIABILITY AND ERRORS AND OMISSIONS INSURANCE IN THE AMOUNT OF $1,000,000;
OR
(3) DEPOSIT WITH THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) CASH IN THE AMOUNT OF $50,000;
(II) SECURITIES WITH A VALUE OF AT LEAST $50,000;

SENATE BILL 922 5
(III) A STATEMENT FROM A LICENSED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION
GUARANTEEING THE PERFORMANCE OF THE SELLER OF TRAVEL OR INDEPENDENT
AGENT; OR
(IV) A SECURITY INTEREST IN PROPERTY WITH A VALUE OF
$50,000.
(C) THE BOND REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
BE PAYABLE TO THE STATE AND THE BOND OR OTHER EVIDENCE OF SECURITY
SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE FOR THE USE AND
BENEFIT OF ANY PERSON:
(1) WHO SUSTAINS A MONETARY LOSS AS A RESULT OF THE FRAUD,
MISREPRESENTATION, BREACH OF CONTRACT, FINANCIAL FAILURE, OR VIOLATION
OF ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE BY THE SELLER OF TRAVEL OR INDEPENDENT
AGENT; OR
(2) FOR WHOM SERVICES HAVE NOT BEEN DELIVERED BY THE
WRONGFUL ACT OF:
(I) THE SELLER OF TRAVEL OR INDEPENDENT AGENT ACTING
IN THE COURSE OF BUSINESS; OR
(II) AN OFFICIAL, AGENT, OR EMPLOYEE OF THE SELLER OF
TRAVEL OR INDEPENDENT AGENT, ACTING IN THE COURSE OF THE OFFICIAL’S,
AGENT’S, OR EMPLOYEE’S EMPLOYMENT OR AGENCY.
17–2204.
THE DIVISION AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE REASONABLE NOTICE OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE TO CONSUMERS AND SELLERS OF TRAVEL; AND
(2) ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
17–2205.
(A) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE
IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $10,000.

SENATE BILL 922
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL ON CONVICTION OF A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT
OFFENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND IS SUBJECT TO
A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $50,000.
(B) (1) A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS
SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $50,000.
(2) A BUSINESS ENTITY ON CONVICTION OF A SECOND OR
SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND
IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $100,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.